New Jersey, session 222, S2466.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    There is imposed and there shall be paid a tax of 7% on or before December 31, 2016, 6.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 6.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 6% on and after January 1, 2026 upon: (a) The receipts from every retail sale of tangible personal property or a specified digital product for permanent use or less than permanent use, and regardless of whether continued payment is required, except as otherwise provided in P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). (b) The receipts from every sale, except for resale, of the following services: (1) Producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting tangible personal property or a specified digital product, performed for a person who directly or indirectly furnishes the tangible personal property or specified digital product, not purchased by the person for resale, upon which these services are performed. (2) Installing tangible personal property or a specified digital product, or maintaining, servicing, repairing tangible personal property or a specified digital product not held for sale in the regular course of business, whether or not the services are performed directly or by means of coin-operated equipment or by any other means, and whether or not any tangible personal property or specified digital product is transferred in conjunction therewith, except (i) such services rendered by an individual who is engaged directly by a private homeowner or lessee in or about [his] that private homeowners or lessees residence and who is not in a regular trade or business offering [his] that individuals services to the public, (ii) such services rendered with respect to personal property exempt from taxation hereunder pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1980, c.105 (C.54:32B-8.1), (iii) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1990, c.40), (iv) any receipts from laundering, dry cleaning, tailoring, weaving, or pressing clothing, and shoe repairing and shoeshining, and (v) services rendered in installing property which, when installed, will constitute an addition or capital improvement to real property, property or land, other than landscaping services and other than installing carpeting and other flooring, and other than sign installation services. (3) Storing all tangible personal property not held for sale in the regular course of business; the rental of safe deposit boxes or similar space; and the furnishing of space for storage of tangible personal property by a person engaged in the business of furnishing space for such storage. "Space for storage" means secure areas, such as rooms, units, compartments, or containers, whether accessible from outside or from within a building, that are designated for the use of a customer and wherein the customer has free access within reasonable business hours, or upon reasonable notice to the furnisher of space for storage, to store and retrieve property.  Space for storage shall not include the lease or rental of an entire building, such as a warehouse or airplane hangar. (4) Maintaining, servicing, or repairing real property, other than a residential heating system unit serving not more than three families living independently of each other and doing their cooking on the premises, whether the services are performed in or outside of a building, as distinguished from adding to or improving the real property by a capital improvement, but excluding services rendered by an individual who is not in a regular trade or business offering [his] that individuals services to the public, and excluding garbage removal and sewer services performed on a regular contractual basis for a term not less than 30 days. (5) Mail processing services for printed advertising material, except for mail processing services in connection with distribution of printed advertising material to out-of-State recipients. (6) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1995, c.184) (7) Utility service provided to persons in this State, any right or power over which is exercised in this State. (8) Tanning services, including the application of a temporary tan provided by any means. (9) Massage, bodywork, or somatic services, except such services provided pursuant to a doctor's prescription. (10) Tattooing, including all permanent body art and permanent cosmetic make-up applications, except such services provided pursuant to a doctor's prescription in conjunction with reconstructive breast surgery. (11) Investigation and security services. (12) Information services. (13) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2017, c.27) (14) Telephone answering services. (15) Radio subscription services. Wages, salaries, and other compensation paid by an employer to an employee for performing as an employee the services described in this subsection are not receipts subject to the taxes imposed under subsection (b) of this section. Services otherwise taxable under paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this section are not subject to the taxes imposed under this subsection, where the tangible personal property or specified digital product upon which the services were performed is delivered to the purchaser outside this State for use outside this State. (c) (1) Receipts from the sale of prepared food in or by restaurants, taverns, or other establishments in this State, or by caterers, including in the amount of such receipts any cover, minimum, entertainment, or other charge made to patrons or customers, except for meals especially prepared for and delivered to homebound elderly, age 60 or older, and to persons with disabilities, or meals prepared and served at a group-sitting at a location outside of the home to otherwise homebound elderly persons, age 60 or older, and otherwise homebound persons with disabilities, as all or part of any food service project funded in whole or in part by government or as part of a private, nonprofit food service project available to all such elderly or persons with disabilities residing within an area of service designated by the private nonprofit organization; and (2) Receipts from sales of food and beverages sold through vending machines, at the wholesale price of such sale, which shall be defined as 70% of the retail vending machine selling price, except sales of milk, which shall not be taxed.  Nothing herein contained shall affect other sales through coin-operated vending machines taxable pursuant to subsection (a) [above] of this section or the exemption thereto provided by section 21 of P.L.1980, c.105 (C.54:32B-8.9). The tax imposed by subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to food or drink which is sold to an airline for consumption while in flight. (3) For the purposes of this subsection: "Food and beverages sold through vending machines" means food and beverages dispensed from a machine or other mechanical device that accepts payment; and "Prepared food" means: (i) A. food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller; or B. two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item, but not including food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller, and eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the Food and Drug Administration in Chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code so as to prevent food borne illnesses; or C.    food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws.  A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; provided however, that (ii) "prepared food" does not include the following sold without eating utensils: A.   food sold by a seller whose proper primary NAICS classification is manufacturing in [section] subsector 311, except [subsector] industry group 3118 (bakeries); B.    food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item; or C.    bakery items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, and tortillas. (d) The rent for every occupancy of a room or rooms in a hotel or transient accommodation in this State, except that the tax shall not be imposed upon a permanent resident. (e) (1) Any admission charge to or for the use of any place of amusement in the State, including charges for admission to race tracks, baseball, football, basketball [or] , exhibitions, dramatic or musical arts performances, motion picture theaters, except charges for admission to boxing, wrestling, kick boxing, or combative sports exhibitions, events, performances, or contests which charges are taxed under any other law of this State or under section 20 of P.L.1985, c.83 (C.5:2A-20), and, except charges to a patron for admission to, or use of, facilities for sporting activities in which the patron is to be a participant, such as bowling alleys and swimming pools.  For any person having the permanent use or possession of a box or seat or lease or a license, other than a season ticket, for the use of a box or seat at a place of amusement, the tax shall be upon the amount for which a similar box or seat is sold for each performance or exhibition at which the box or seat is used or reserved by the holder, licensee, or lessee, and shall be paid by the holder, licensee, or lessee. (2) The amount paid as charge of a roof garden, cabaret, or other similar place in this State, to the extent that a tax upon these charges has not been paid pursuant to subsection (c) hereof. (f) (1) The receipts from every sale, except for resale, of intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications services and ancillary services sourced to this State in accordance with section 29 of P.L.2005, c.126 (C.54:32B-3.4). (2) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.123) (g) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.123) (h) Charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees or dues for access to or use of the property or facilities of a health and fitness, athletic, sporting, or shopping club or organization in this State, except for: (1) membership in a club or organization whose members are predominantly age 18 or under; and (2) charges in the nature of membership fees or dues for access to or use of the property or facilities of a health and fitness, athletic, sporting, or shopping club or organization that is exempt from taxation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of section 9 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-9), or that is exempt from taxation pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of section 9 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-9) and that has complied with subsection (d) of section 9 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-9). (i) The receipts from parking, storing, or garaging a motor vehicle, excluding charges for the following: residential parking; employee parking, when provided by an employer or at a facility owned or operated by the employer; municipal parking, storing, or garaging; receipts from charges or fees imposed pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1993, c.159 (C.5:12-173.3) or pursuant to an agreement between the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority and a casino operator in effect on the date of enactment of P.L.2007, c.105; and receipts from parking, storing, or garaging a motor vehicle subject to tax pursuant to any other law or ordinance. For the purposes of this subsection, "municipal parking, storing, or garaging" means any motor vehicle parking, storing, or garaging provided by a municipality or county, or a parking authority thereof. (cf: P.L.2022, c.97, s.2) 2.    Section 5 P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), receipts received from all sales made and services rendered on and after January 3, 1983 but prior to July 1, 1990, are subject to the taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), and (f) of section 3 of [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) at the rate, if any, in effect for such sales and services on June 30, 1990, except if the property so sold is delivered or the services so sold are rendered on or after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992, in which case the tax shall be computed and paid at the rate of 7%; provided, however, that if a service or maintenance agreement taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) covers any period commencing on or after January 3, 1983 and ending after June 30, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992, the receipts from such agreement are subject to tax at the rate, if any, applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), receipts received from all sales made and services rendered on and after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992, are subject to the taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c) and (f) of section 3 of [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) at the rate of 7%, except if the property so sold is delivered or the services so sold are rendered on or after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006, in which case the tax shall be computed and paid at the rate of 6%, provided, however, that if a service or maintenance agreement taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) covers any period commencing on or after July 1, 1990, and ending after July 1, 1992, the receipts from such agreement are subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (3)  Except as otherwise provided in [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), receipts received from all sales made and services rendered on and after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006, are subject to the taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f) and (g) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) at the rate of 6%, except if the property so sold is delivered or the services so sold are rendered on or after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017, in which case the tax shall be computed and paid at the rate of 7%, provided, however, that if a service or maintenance agreement taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) covers any period commencing on or after July 1, 1992, and ending after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017, the receipts from such agreement are subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby; provided however, if a service or maintenance agreement in effect on July 14, 2006 covers billing periods ending after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017, the seller shall charge and collect from the purchaser a tax on such sales at the rate of 6%, unless the billing period starts on or after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017 in which case the seller shall charge and collect a tax at the rate of 7%. (4)  Except as otherwise provided in [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), receipts received from all sales made and services rendered on or after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017, are subject to the taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), and (i) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) at the rate of 7%, except if the property so sold is delivered or the services so sold are rendered on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018, in which case the tax shall be computed and paid at the rate of 6.875%; provided, however, that if a service or maintenance agreement taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) covers any period commencing on or after July 15, 2006 and ending after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018, the receipts from such agreement are subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby; provided, further, if a service or maintenance agreement in effect on December 31, 2016 covers billing periods ending after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018, the seller shall charge and collect from the purchaser a tax on such sales at the rate of 7%, unless the bill for such service or maintenance agreement is rendered on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018 in which case the seller shall charge and collect a tax at a rate of 6.875%. (5)  Except as otherwise provided in [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), receipts received from all sales made and services rendered on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018, are subject to the taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), and (i) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) at the rate of 6.875%, except if the property so sold is delivered or the services so sold are rendered on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026, in which case the tax shall be computed and paid at the rate of 6.625%; provided, however, that if a service or maintenance agreement taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) covers any period commencing on or after January 1, 2017 and ending after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026, the receipts from such agreement are subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby; provided, further, if a service or maintenance agreement in effect on December 31, 2017 covers billing periods ending after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026, the seller shall charge and collect from the purchaser a tax on such sales at the rate of 6.875%, unless the bill for such service or maintenance agreement is rendered on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026 in which case the seller shall charge and collect a tax at a rate of 6.625%. (6)  Except as otherwise provided in P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), receipts from all sales made and services rendered on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026, are subject to the taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), and (i) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) at the rate of 6.625%, except if the property so sold is delivered or the services so sold are rendered on or after January 1, 2026, in which case the tax shall be computed and paid at the rate of 6%; provided, however, that if a service or maintenance agreement under P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) covers any period commencing on or after January 1, 2018 and ending after January 1, 2026, the receipts from such agreement are subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby; provided, further, if a services or maintenance agreement in effect on December 31, 2025 covers billing periods after January 1, 2026, the seller shall charge and collect from the purchaser a tax on such sales at the rate of 6.625%, unless the bill for such service or maintenance agreement is rendered on or after January 1, 2026, in which case the seller shall charge and collect a tax at a rate of 6%. b. (1) The tax imposed under subsection (d) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be paid at the rate of 7% upon any occupancy on and after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992, although such occupancy is pursuant to a prior contract, lease or other arrangement. If an occupancy, taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), covers any period on or after January 3, 1983 but prior to July 1, 1990, the rent for the period of occupancy prior to July 1, 1990 shall be taxed at the rate of 6%.  If rent is paid on a weekly, monthly or other term basis, the rent applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (2)  The tax imposed under subsection (d) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be paid at the rate of 6% upon any occupancy on and after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006, although such occupancy is pursuant to a prior contract, lease or other arrangement.  If an occupancy, taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), as amended and supplemented, covers any period on or after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992, the rent for the period of occupancy prior to July 1, 1992 shall be taxed at the rate of 7%.  If rent is paid on a weekly, monthly or other term basis, the rent applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (3)  The tax imposed under subsection (d) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be paid at the rate of 7% upon any occupancy on and after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017, although such occupancy is pursuant to a prior contract, lease or other arrangement.  If an occupancy, taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), covers any period on or after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006, the rent for the period of occupancy prior to July 15, 2006 shall be taxed at the rate of 6%.  If rent is paid on a weekly, monthly or other term basis, the rent applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (4)  The tax imposed under subsection (d) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be paid at the rate of 6.875% upon any occupancy on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018, although such occupancy is pursuant to a prior contract, lease, or other arrangement.  If an occupancy, taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), covers any period on or after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017, the rent for the period of occupancy prior to January 1, 2017 shall be taxed at the rate of 7%.  If rent is paid on a weekly, monthly, or other term basis, the rent applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (5)  The tax imposed under subsection (d) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be paid at the rate of 6.625% upon any occupancy on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026, although such occupancy is pursuant to a prior contract, lease, or other arrangement.  If an occupancy, taxable under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), covers any period on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018, the rent for the period of occupancy prior to January 1, 2018 shall be taxed at the rate of 6.875%.  If rent is paid on a weekly, monthly, or other term basis, the rent applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (6)  The tax imposed under subsection (d) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be paid at the rate of 6% upon any occupancy on or after January 1, 2026, although such occupancy is pursuant to a prior contract, lease, or other arrangement.  If an occupancy taxable under P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), covers any period on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026, the rent for the period of occupancy prior to January 1, 2026 shall be taxed at the rate of 6.625%.  If rent is paid on a weekly, monthly, or other term basis, the rent applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. c.    (1) Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the tax imposed under subsection (e) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be applicable at the rate of 7% to any admission to or for the use of facilities of a place of amusement occurring on or after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992, whether or not the admission charge has been paid prior to July 1, 1990, unless the tickets were actually sold and delivered, other than for resale, prior to July 1, 1990 and the tax imposed under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) during the period January 3, 1983 through June 30, 1990 shall have been paid. (2)  Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the tax imposed under subsection (e) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be applicable at the rate of 6% to any admission to or for the use of facilities of a place of amusement occurring on or after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006, whether or not the admission charge has been paid prior to July 1, 1992, unless the tickets were actually sold and delivered, other than for resale, prior to July 1, 1992 and the tax imposed under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) during the period July 1, 1990 through December 31, 1990 shall have been paid. (3)  Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the tax imposed under subsection (e) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be applicable at the rate of 7% to any admission to or for the use of facilities of a place of amusement occurring on or after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017, whether or not the admission charge has been paid prior to July 15, 2006, unless the tickets were actually sold and delivered, other than for resale, prior to July 15, 2006 and the tax imposed under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) during the period July 1, 1992 through July 14, 2006 shall have been paid. (4)  Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the tax imposed under subsection (e) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be applicable at the rate of 6.875% to any admission to or for the use of facilities of a place of amusement occurring on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018, whether or not the admission charge has been paid prior to January 1, 2017, unless the tickets were actually sold and delivered, other than for resale, prior to January 1, 2017 and the tax imposed under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) during the period July 15, 2006 through December 31, 2016 shall have been paid. (5)  Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the tax imposed under subsection (e) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be applicable at the rate of 6.625% to any admission to or for the use of facilities of a place of amusement occurring on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026, whether or not the admission charge has been paid prior to [that date] January 1, 2026, unless the tickets were actually sold and delivered, other than for resale, prior to January 1, 2018 and the tax imposed under [this act] P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) during the period January 1, 2017 through December 31, 2017 shall have been paid. (6)  Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the tax imposed under subsection (e) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) shall be applicable at the rate of 6% to any admission to or for the use of facilities of a place of amusement occurring on or after January 1, 2026, whether or not the admission charge has been paid prior to January 1, 2026, unless the tickets were actually sold and delivered, other than for resale, prior to January 1, 2026 and the tax imposed under P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) during the period January 1, 2018 through December 31, 2025 shall have been paid. d. (1) Sales made on and after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992 to contractors, subcontractors or repairmen of materials, supplies, or services for use in erecting structures for others, or building on, or otherwise improving, altering or repairing real property of others shall be subject to the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6) at the rate of 7%; provided, however, that if such sales are made for use in performance of a contract which is either of a fixed price not subject to change or modification, or entered into pursuant to the obligation of a formal written bid which cannot be altered or withdrawn, and, in either case, such contract was entered into or such bid was made on or after January 3, 1983 but prior to July 1, 1990, such sales shall be subject to tax at the rate of 6%, but the vendor shall charge and collect from the purchaser a tax on such sales at the rate of 7%. (2)  Sales made on or after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006 to contractors, subcontractors or repairmen of materials, supplies, or services for use in erecting structures for others, or building on, or otherwise improving, altering or repairing real property of others shall be subject to the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6) at the rate of 6%; provided, however, that if such sales are made for use in performance of a contract which is either of a fixed price not subject to change or modification, or entered into pursuant to the obligation of a formal written bid which cannot be altered or withdrawn, and, in either case, such contract was entered into or such bid was made on or after July 1, 1990, but prior to July 1, 1992, such sales shall be subject to tax at the rate of 7%. (3)  Sales made on or after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017 to contractors, subcontractors or repairmen of materials, supplies, or services for use in erecting structures for others, or building on, or otherwise improving, altering or repairing real property of others shall be subject to the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6) at the rate of 7%; provided, however, that if such sales are made for use in performance of a contract which is either of a fixed price not subject to change or modification, or entered into pursuant to the obligation of a formal written bid which cannot be altered or withdrawn, and, in either case, such contract was entered into or such bid was made on or after July 1, 1992, but prior to July 15, 2006, such sales shall be subject to tax at the rate of 6%, but the seller shall charge and collect from the purchaser a tax on such sales at the rate of 7%. (4)  Sales made on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018 to contractors, subcontractors, or repairmen of materials, supplies, or services for use in erecting structures for others, or building on, or otherwise improving, altering or repairing real property of others shall be subject to the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6) at the rate of 6.875%; provided, however, that if such sales are made for use in the performance of a contract which is either of a fixed price not subject to change or modification, or entered into pursuant to the obligation of a formal written bid which cannot be altered or withdrawn, and, in either case, such contract was entered into or such bid was made on or after July 15, 2006, but prior to January 1, 2017, such sales shall be subject to tax at the rate of 7%. (5)  Sales made on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026 to contractors, subcontractors, or repairmen of materials, supplies, or services for use in erecting structures for others, or building on, or otherwise improving, altering or repairing real property of others shall be subject to the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6) at the rate of 6.625%; provided, however, that if such sales are made for use in the performance of a contract which is either of a fixed price not subject to change or modification, or entered into pursuant to the obligation of a formal written bid which cannot be altered or withdrawn, and, in either case, such contract was entered into or such bid was made prior to January 1, 2018, such sales shall be subject to tax at the rate in effect during the time period in which such contract was entered into or such bid was made. (6)  Sales made on or after January 1, 2026 to contractors, subcontractors, or repairmen of materials, supplies, or services for use in erecting structures for others, or building on, or otherwise improving, altering, or repairing real property of others shall be subject to the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section 6 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6) at the rate of 6%; provided, however, that if such sales are made for use in the performance of a contract which is either of a fixed price not subject to change or modification, or entered into pursuant to the obligation of a formal written bid which cannot be altered or withdrawn, and, in either case, such contract was entered into or such bid was made prior to January 1, 2026, such sales shall be subject to tax at the rate in effect during the time period in which such contract was entered into or such bid was made. e. (1) As to sales other than those referred to in subsection d. [above] of this section, the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6), and the taxes imposed under subsection (f) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6), upon receipts received on or after July 1, 1990 and on or before December 31, 1990, shall be at the rate in effect on June 30, 1990, in case of sales made or services rendered pursuant to a written contract entered on or after January 3, 1983 but prior to July 1, 1990, and accompanied by a deposit or partial payment of the contract price, except in the case of a contract which, in the usage of trade, is not customarily accompanied by a deposit or partial payment of the contract price, but the vendor shall charge and collect from the purchaser on such sales at the rate of 7%, which tax shall be reduced to the rate, if any, in effect on June 30, 1990, only by a claim for refund filed by the purchaser with the director within 90 days after receipt of said receipts and otherwise pursuant to the provisions of section 20 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-20). A claim for refund shall not be allowed if there has been no deposit or partial payment of the contract price unless the claimant shall establish by clear and convincing evidence that, in the usage of trade, such contracts are not customarily accompanied by a deposit or partial payment of the contract price. (2)  As to sales other than those referred to in subsection d. [above] of this section, the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6), and the taxes imposed under subsections (f) and (g) of section 3 and section 6 [hereof] of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3 and C.54:32B-6), upon receipts received on or after July 15, 2006 and on or before December 31, 2006, shall be at the rate in effect on July 14, 2006, in case of sales made or services rendered pursuant to a written contract entered on or after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006, and accompanied by a deposit or partial payment of the contract price, except in the case of a contract which, in the usage of trade, is not customarily accompanied by a deposit or partial payment of the contract price, but the seller shall charge and collect from the purchaser on such sales at the rate of 7%, which tax shall be reduced to the rate, if any, in effect on July 14, 2006, only by a claim for refund filed by the purchaser with the director within 90 days after receipt of said receipts and otherwise pursuant to the provisions of section 20 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-20).  A claim for refund shall not be allowed if there has been no deposit or partial payment of the contract price unless the claimant shall establish by clear and convincing evidence that, in the usage of trade, such contracts are not customarily accompanied by a deposit or partial payment of the contract price. f. (1) The taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c) and (f) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) upon receipts received on or after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992 shall be at the rate, if any, in effect on June 30, 1990 in the case of sales made or services rendered, if delivery of the property which was the subject matter of the sale has been completed or such services have been entirely rendered prior to July 1, 1990. (2)  The taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c) and (f) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) upon receipts received on or after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006 shall be at the rate of 7% in the case of sales made or services rendered, where delivery of the property which was the subject matter of the sale has been completed or such services have been entirely rendered on or after July 1, 1990 but prior to July 1, 1992. (3)  The taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f) and (g) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) upon receipts received on or after July 15, 2006 shall be at the rate of 6% in the case of sales made or services rendered, where delivery of the property which was the subject matter of the sale has been completed or such services have been entirely rendered on or after July 1, 1992 but prior to July 15, 2006. (4)  The taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), and (i) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) upon receipts received on or after January 1, 2017 shall be at the rate of 7% in the case of sales made or services rendered, where delivery of the property which was the subject matter of the sale has been completed or such services have been entirely rendered on or after July 15, 2006 but prior to January 1, 2017. (5)  The taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), and (i) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) upon receipts received on or after January 1, 2018 shall be at the rate of 6.875% in the case of sales made or services rendered, where delivery of the property which was the subject matter of the sale has been completed or such services have been entirely rendered on or after January 1, 2017 but prior to January 1, 2018. (6)  The taxes imposed under subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), and (i) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) upon receipts received on or after January 1, 2026 shall be at the rate of 6.625% in the case of sales made or services rendered, where delivery of the property which was the subject matter of the sale has been completed or such services have been entirely rendered on or after January 1, 2018 but prior to January 1, 2026. g. (1) Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the taxes imposed by subsection (h) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) and clause (J) of section 6 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-6) shall be imposed and paid at the rate of 6.875% upon all charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees, or dues paid on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018.  All charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees, or dues paid on or after October 1, 2006 but before January 1, 2017 shall be imposed and paid at the rate of 7%; provided, however, that any charges in the nature of membership fees and dues paid on or after October 1, 2006 but before January 1, 2017 that allow a member access to or use of the property or facilities of a health and fitness, athletic, sporting, or shopping club or organization in this State for any period beginning on or after October 1, 2006 but before January 1, 2017 and ending on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018 shall be subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (2)  Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the taxes imposed by subsection (h) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) and clause (J) of section 6 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-6) shall be imposed and paid at the rate of 6.625% upon all charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees, or dues paid on or after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026.  All charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees, or dues paid on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018 shall be imposed and paid at the rate of 6.875%; provided, however, that any charges in the nature of membership fees and dues paid on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018 that allow a member access to or use of the property or facilities of a health and fitness, athletic, sporting, or shopping club or organization in this State for any period beginning on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018 and ending on or after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026 shall be subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. (3)  Except as otherwise hereinafter provided, the taxes imposed by subsection (h) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) and clause (J) of section 6 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-6) shall be imposed and paid at the rate of 6% upon all charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees, or dues paid on or after January 1, 2026.  All charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees, or dues paid on or after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026 shall be imposed and paid at the rate of 6.625%; provided, however, that any charges in the nature of membership fees and dues paid on or after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026 that allow a member access to or use of the property or facilities of a health and fitness, athletic, sporting, or shopping club or organization in this State for any period beginning on or after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026 shall be subject to tax at the rate applicable to each period as set forth hereinabove and shall be apportioned on the basis of the ratio of the number of days falling within each of the said periods to the total number of days covered thereby. h.    The director is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2016, c.57, s.3) 3.    Section 6 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.    Unless property or services have already been or will be subject to the sales tax under P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), there is hereby imposed on and there shall be paid by every person a use tax for the use within this State of 7% on or before December 31, 2016, 6.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 6.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 6% on and after January 1, 2026, except as otherwise exempted under P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), (A) of any tangible personal property or specified digital product purchased at retail, including energy, provided however, that electricity consumed by the generating facility that produced it shall not be subject to tax, (B) of any tangible personal property or specified digital product manufactured, processed, or assembled by the user, if items of the same kind of tangible personal property or specified digital products are offered for sale by [him] the user in the regular course of business, or if items of the same kind of tangible personal property are not offered for sale by [him] the user in the regular course of business and are used as such or incorporated into a structure, building, or real property, (C) of any tangible personal property or specified digital product, however acquired, where not acquired for purposes of resale, upon which any taxable services described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) have been performed, (D) of intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications services described in subsection (f) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3), (E) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1995, c.184), (F) of utility service provided to persons in this State for use in this State, provided however, that utility service used by the facility that provides the service shall not be subject to tax, (G) of mail processing services described in paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3), (H) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.123), (I) of any services subject to tax pursuant to subsection (11), (12), (14), or (15) of subsection (b) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3), and (J) of access to or use of the property or facilities of a health and fitness, athletic, sporting, or shopping club or organization in this State.  For purposes of clause (A) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate, as set forth hereinabove, of the consideration given or contracted to be given for the property or for the use of the property including delivery charges made by the seller, but excluding any credit for property of the same kind accepted in part payment and intended for resale. For the purposes of clause (B) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate, as set forth hereinabove, of the price at which items of the same kind of tangible personal property or specified digital products are offered for sale by the user, or if items of the same kind of tangible personal property are not offered for sale by the user in the regular course of business and are used as such or incorporated into a structure, building, or real property the tax shall be at the applicable rate, as set forth hereinabove, of the consideration given or contracted to be given for the tangible personal property manufactured, processed, or assembled by the user into the tangible personal property the use of which is subject to use tax pursuant to this section, and the mere storage, keeping, retention, or withdrawal from storage of tangible personal property or specified digital products by the person who manufactured, processed, or assembled the property shall not be deemed a taxable use by [him] the person. For purposes of clause (C) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate, as set forth hereinabove, of the consideration given or contracted to be given for the service, including the consideration for any tangible personal property or specified digital product transferred in conjunction with the performance of the service, including delivery charges made by the seller.  For the purposes of clause (D) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate on the charge made by the telecommunications service provider; provided however, that for prepaid calling services and prepaid wireless calling services the tax shall be at the applicable rate on the consideration given or contracted to be given for the prepaid calling service or prepaid wireless calling service or the recharge of the prepaid calling service or prepaid wireless calling service.  For purposes of clause (F) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate on the charge made by the utility service provider.  For purposes of clause (G) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate on that proportion of the amount of all processing costs charged by a mail processing service provider that is attributable to the service distributed in this State.  For purposes of clause (I) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate on the charge made by the service provider.  For purposes of clause (J) of this section, the tax shall be at the applicable rate on the charges in the nature of initiation fees, membership fees or dues. (cf: P.L.2017, c.27, s.2) 4.    Section 31 of P.L.1980, c.105 (C.54:32B-8.19) is amended to read as follows: 31. Receipts from sales of tangible personal property and services taxable under any municipal ordinance which was adopted pursuant to P.L.1947, c.71 (C.40:48-8.15 et seq.) and was in effect on April 27, 1966 are exempt from the tax imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Act, subject to the following conditions: a.    To the extent that the tax that is or would be imposed under section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-3) is greater than the tax imposed by such ordinance, such sales shall not be exempt under this section; and b.    Irrespective of the rate of tax imposed by such ordinance, such sales shall be exempt only to the extent that the rate of taxation imposed by the ordinance exceeds 6%, except that the combined rate of taxation imposed under the ordinance and under this section shall not exceed 13% on or before December 31, 2016, 12.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 12.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 12% on and after January 1, 2026. (cf: P.L.2016, s.57, s.5) 5.    Section 1 of P.L.2003, c.114 (C.54:32D-1) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. In addition to any other tax, assessment or use fee authorized by law, there is imposed and shall be paid a hotel and motel occupancy fee of 7% for occupancies on and after August 1, 2003 but before July 1, 2004, and of 5% for occupancies on and after July 1, 2004, upon the rent for every occupancy of a room or rooms in a hotel or transient accommodation subject to taxation pursuant to subsection (d) of section 3 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C:54:32B-3), which every person required to collect tax shall collect from the customer when collecting the rent to which it applies; provided however, that on and after the tenth day following a certification by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury pursuant to subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.2003, c.114 (C.54:32D-2), no such fee shall be paid or collected; and provided further that: (1)  the combined rates of the fee imposed under this section, plus the tax imposed under the "Sales and Use Tax Act", P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), plus any tax imposed under P.L.1947, c.71 (C.40:48-8.15 et seq.), shall not exceed a total rate of 14% on or before December 31, 2016, 13.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 13.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 13% on and after January 1, 2026, and to the extent that the total combined rate of taxation for the listed fees and taxes would exceed 14% on or before December 31, 2016, 13.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 13.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 13% on or after January 1, 2026, the fee imposed under this section shall be reduced so that the total combined rate equals 14% on or before December 31, 2016, 13.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 13.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 13% on and after January 1, 2026; (2)  the combined rates of the fee imposed under this section, plus the tax imposed under the "Sales and Use Tax Act", P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), plus any tax and assessment imposed under section 4 of P.L.1992, c.165 (C.40:54D-4), shall not exceed a total rate of 14% on or before December 31, 2016, 13.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 13.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 13% on and after January 1, 2026, and to the extent that the total combined rate of taxation for the listed fees and taxes would exceed 14% on or before December 31, 2016, 13.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 13.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 13% on and after January 1, 2026, the fee imposed under this section shall be reduced so that the total combined rate equals 14% on or before December 31, 2016, 13.875% on and after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2018, [and] 13.625% on and after January 1, 2018 but before January 1, 2026, and 13% on and after January 1, 2026; and (3)  the fee imposed under this section shall be at the rate of 1% in a city in which the tax authorized under P.L.1981, c.77 (C.40:48E-1 et seq.) is imposed. b.    The hotel and motel occupancy fee imposed by subsection a. of this section shall not be imposed on the rent for an occupancy if the purchaser, user or consumer is an entity exempt from the tax imposed on an occupancy under the "Sales and Use Tax Act" pursuant to subsection (a) of section 9 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-9). c.    Terms used in this section shall have the meaning given those terms pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-2). (cf: P.L.2018, c.49, s.22) 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.